Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 80A.50, is amended to read: 80A.50 SECTION 302; FEDERAL COVERED SECURITIES; SMALL CORPORATE OFFERING REGISTRATION. (a) Federal covered securities. (1) Required filing of records. With respect to a federal covered security, as defined in Section 18(b)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. Section 77r(b)(2)), that is not otherwise exempt under sections 80A.45 through 80A.47, a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require the filing of any or all of the following records: (A) before the initial offer of a federal covered security in this state, all records that are part of a federal registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission under the Securities Act of 1933 and a consent to service of process complying with section 80A.88 signed by the issuer; (B) after the initial offer of the federal covered security in this state, all records that are part of an amendment to a federal registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission under the Securities Act of 1933; and (C) to the extent necessary or appropriate to compute fees, a report of the value of the federal covered securities sold or offered to persons present in this state, if the sales data are not included in records filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. (2) Notice filing effectiveness and renewal. A notice filing under subsection (a) is effective for one year commencing on the later of the notice filing or the effectiveness of the offering filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. On or before expiration, the issuer may renew a notice filing by filing a copy of those records filed by the issuer with the Securities and Exchange Commission that are required by rule or order under this chapter to be filed. A previously filed consent to service of process complying with section 80A.88 may be incorporated by reference in a renewal. A renewed notice filing becomes effective upon the expiration of the filing being renewed. (3) Notice filings for federal covered securities under section 18(b)(4)(D). With respect to a security that is a federal covered security under Section 18(b)(4)(D) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. Section 77r(b)(4)(D)), a rule under this chapter may require a notice filing by or on behalf of an issuer to include a copy of Form D, including the Appendix, as promulgated by the Securities and Exchange Commission, and a consent to service of process complying with section 80A.88 signed by the issuer not later than 15 days after the first sale of the federal covered security in this state. (4) Stop orders. Except with respect to a federal security under Section 18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. Section 77r(b)(1)), if the administrator finds that there is a failure to comply with a notice or fee requirement of this section, the administrator may issue a stop order suspending the offer and sale of a federal covered security in this state. If the deficiency is corrected, the stop order is void as of the time of its issuance and no penalty may be imposed by the administrator. (b) Small corporation offering registration. (1) Registration required. A security meeting the conditions set forth in this section may be registered as set forth in this section. (2) Availability. Registration under this section is available only to the issuer of securities and not to an affiliate of the issuer or to any other person for resale of the issuer's securities. The issuer must be organized under the laws of one of the states or possessions of the United States. The securities offered must be exempt from registration under the Securities Act of 1933 pursuant to Rule 504 of Regulation D (15 U.S.C. Section 77c). (3) Disqualification. Registration under this section is not available to any of the following issuers: (A) an issuer subject to the reporting requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; (B) an investment company; (C) a development stage company that either has no specific business plan or purpose or has indicated that its business plan is to engage in a merger or acquisition with an unidentified company or companies or other entity or person; (D) an issuer if the issuer or any of its predecessors, officers, directors, governors, partners, ten percent stock or equity holders, promoters, or any selling agents of the securities to be offered, or any officer, director, governor, or partner of the selling agent: (i) has filed a registration statement that is the subject of a currently effective registration stop order entered under a federal or state securities law within five years before the filing of the small corporate offering registration application; (ii) has been convicted within five years before the filing of the small corporate offering registration application of a felony or misdemeanor in connection with the offer, purchase, or sale of a security or a felony involving fraud or deceit, including, but not limited to, forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, larceny, or conspiracy to defraud; (iii) is currently subject to a state administrative enforcement order or judgment entered by a state securities administrator or the Securities and Exchange Commission within five years before the filing of the small corporate offering registration application, or is subject to a federal or state administrative enforcement order or judgment in which fraud or deceit, including, but not limited to, making untrue statements of material facts or omitting to state material facts, was found and the order or judgment was entered within five years before the filing of the small corporate offering registration application; (iv) is currently subject to an order, judgment, or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction temporarily restraining or enjoining, or is subject to an order, judgment, or decree of a court of competent jurisdiction permanently restraining or enjoining the party from engaging in or continuing any conduct or practice in connection with the purchase or sale of any security or involving the making of a false filing with a state or with the Securities and Exchange Commission entered within five years before the filing of the small corporate offering registration application; or (v) is subject to a state's administrative enforcement order, or judgment that prohibits, denies, or revokes the use of an exemption for registration in connection with the offer, purchase, or sale of securities, (I) except that clauses (i) to (iv) do not apply if the person subject to the disqualification is duly licensed or registered to conduct securities-related business in the state in which the administrative order or judgment was entered against the person or if the dealer employing the party is licensed or registered in this state and the form BD filed in this state discloses the order, conviction, judgment, or decree relating to the person, and (II) except that the disqualification under this subdivision is automatically waived if the state securities administrator or federal agency that created the basis for disqualification determines upon a showing of good cause that it is not necessary under the circumstances to deny the registration. (4) Filing and effectiveness of registration statement. A small corporate offering registration statement must be filed with the administrator. If no stop order is in effect and no proceeding is pending under section 80A.54, such registration statement shall become effective automatically at the close of business on the 20th day after filing of the registration statement or the last amendment of the registration statement or at such earlier time as the administrator may designate by rule or order. For the purposes of a nonissuer transaction, other than by an affiliate of the issuer, all outstanding securities of the same class identified in the small corporate offering registration statement as a security registered under this chapter are considered to be registered while the small corporate offering registration statement is effective. A small corporate offering registration statement is effective for one year after its effective date or for any longer period designated in an order under this chapter. A small corporate offering registration statement may be withdrawn only with the approval of the administrator. (5) Contents of registration statement. A small corporate offering registration statement under this section shall be on Form U-7, including exhibits required by the instructions thereto, as adopted by the North American Securities Administrators Association, or such alternative form as may be designated by the administrator by rule or order and must include: (A) a consent to service of process complying with section 80A.88; (B) a statement of the type and amount of securities to be offered and the amount of securities to be offered in this state; (C) a specimen or copy of the security being registered, unless the security is uncertificated, a copy of the issuer's articles of incorporation and bylaws or their substantial equivalents in effect, and a copy of any indenture or other instrument covering the security to be registered; (D) a signed or conformed copy of an opinion of counsel concerning the legality of the securities being registered which states whether the securities, when sold, will be validly issued, fully paid, and nonassessable and, if debt securities, binding obligations of the issuer; (E) the states (i) in which the securities are proposed to be offered; (ii) in which a registration statement or similar filing has been made in connection with the offering including information as to effectiveness of each such filing; and (iii) in which a stop order or similar proceeding has been entered or in which proceedings or actions seeking such an order are pending; (F) a copy of the offering document proposed to be delivered to offerees; and (G) a copy of any other pamphlet, circular, form letter, advertisement, or other sales literature intended as of the effective date to be used in connection with the offering and any solicitation of interest used in compliance with section 80A.46(17)(B). (6) Copy to purchaser. A copy of the offering document as filed with the administrator must be delivered to each person purchasing the securities prior to sale of the securities to such person. (c) Offering limit. Offers and sales of securities under a small corporate offering registration as set forth in this section are allowed up to the limit prescribed by Code of Federal Regulations, title 17, part 230.504 (b)(2), as amended. (d) Regulation A - Tier 2 filing requirements. (1) Initial filing. An issuer planning to offer and sell securities in Minnesota in an offering exempt under Tier 2 of federal Regulation A must, at least 21 calendar days before the date of the initial sale of securities in Minnesota, submit to the administrator: (A) a completed Regulation A - Tier 2 offering notice filing form or copies of all the documents filed with the Securities Exchange Commission; and (B) a consent to service of process on Form U-2, if consent to service of process is not provided in the Regulation A - Tier 2 offering notice filing form. The initial notice filing made in Minnesota is effective for 12 months after the date the filing is made. (2) Renewal. For each additional 12-month period in which the same offering is continued, an issuer conducting a Tier 2 offering under federal Regulation A may renew the notice filing by filing (i) the Regulation A - Tier 2 offering notice filing form marked "renewal," or (ii) a cover letter or other document requesting renewal. The renewal filing must be made on or before the date notice filing expires. (3) Amendment. An issuer may increase the amount of securities offered in Minnesota by submitting a Regulation A - Tier 2 offering notice filing form or other document describing the transaction. new text begin (e) Notice filing requirement for federal crowdfunding offerings. This paragraph applies to offerings made under Regulation Crowdfunding, Code of Federal Regulations, title 17, part 227, and sections 4(a)(6) and 18(b)(4)(C) of the Securities Act of 1933, United States Code, title 15, sections 77d(A)(6) and 77r(b)(4)(C). new text end new text begin (1) Initial filing. An issuer that (i) offers and sells securities in Minnesota in an offering exempt under federal Regulation Crowdfunding, and (ii) has a principal place of business in Minnesota or sells at least 50 percent of the offering's aggregate amount to Minnesota residents, must file with the administrator: new text end new text begin (A) a completed Uniform Notice of Federal Crowdfunding Offering form or copies of all documents filed with the Securities Exchange Commission; and new text end new text begin (B) if the issuer is not filing on the Uniform Notice of Federal Crowdfunding Offering form, consent to service of process on Form U-2. new text end new text begin If the issuer's principal place of business is in Minnesota, the initial filing must be submitted with the administrator when the issuer makes the issuer's initial Form C filing concerning the offering with the Securities and Exchange Commission. If the issuer's principal place of business is not in Minnesota but Minnesota residents have purchased at least 50 percent of the aggregate amount of the offering, the filing must be submitted when the issuer becomes aware that the aggregate purchases made by Minnesota residents meets the threshold, but no later than 30 days after the date the offering is complete. The initial notice filing is effective for a 12-month period beginning on the date the initial filing is submitted to the administrator. new text end new text begin (2) Renewal. For each additional 12-month period in which a single offering is continued, an issuer conducting an offering under federal Regulation Crowdfunding may renew the issuer's notice filing by filing with the administrator on or before the date the current notice filing expires: new text end new text begin (A) a completed Uniform Notice of Federal Crowdfunding Offering form that is marked "renewal"; or new text end new text begin (B) a cover letter or other document requesting renewal new text end new text begin . new text end new text begin (3) Amendment. An issuer may increase the amount of securities offered in Minnesota by submitting (i) a completed Uniform Notice of Federal Crowdfunding Offering form that is marked "amendment," or (ii) another document that describes the modified transaction. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 80A.66, is amended to read: 80A.66 SECTION 411; POSTREGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS. (a) Financial requirements. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22), a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may establish minimum financial requirements for broker-dealers registered or required to be registered under this chapter and investment advisers registered or required to be registered under this chapter. (b) Financial reports. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222(b) of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22), a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter shall file such financial reports as are required by a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. If the information contained in a record filed under this subsection is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in a material respect, the registrant shall promptly file a correcting amendment. (c) Record keeping. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22): (1) a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter shall make and maintain the accounts, correspondence, memoranda, papers, books, and other records required by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter; (2) broker-dealer records required to be maintained under paragraph (1) may be maintained in any form of data storage acceptable under Section 17(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78q(a)) if they are readily accessible to the administrator; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (3) a broker-dealer must establish and maintain: (i) a set of written supervisory procedures that reasonably prevent and detect violations of chapter 80A; Minnesota Rules, chapter 2876; or related orders issued by the commissioner; and (ii) a system to apply the procedures established under this clause. The procedures must designate by name or title a number of supervisory employees that is reasonable relative to the number of the broker-dealer's registered agents, offices, and transactions in Minnesota. A copy of the written procedures and the system to apply the procedures must be kept and maintained at each branch office affiliated with the broker-dealer; and new text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end investment adviser records required to be maintained under paragraph (d)(1) may be maintained in any form of data storage required by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. (d) Records and reports of private funds. (1) In general. An investment adviser to a private fund shall maintain such records of, and file with the administrator such reports and amendments thereto, that an exempt reporting adviser is required to file with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to SEC Rule 204-4, Code of Federal Regulations, title 17, section 275.204-4. (2) Treatment of records. The records and reports of any private fund to which an investment adviser provides investment advice shall be deemed to be the records and reports of the investment adviser. (3) Required information. The records and reports required to be maintained by an investment adviser, which are subject to inspection by a representative of the administrator at any time, shall include for each private fund advised by the investment adviser, a description of: (A) the amount of assets under management; (B) the use of leverage, including off-balance-sheet leverage, as to the assets under management; (C) counterparty credit risk exposure; (D) trading and investment positions; (E) valuation policies and practices of the fund; (F) types of assets held; (G) side arrangements or side letters, whereby certain investors in a fund obtain more favorable rights or entitlements than other investors; (H) trading practices; and (I) such other information as the administrator determines is necessary and appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors, which may include the establishment of different reporting requirements for different classes of fund advisers, based on the type or size of the private fund being advised. (4) Filing of records. A rule or order under this chapter may require each investment adviser to a private fund to file reports containing such information as the administrator deems necessary and appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors. (e) Audits or inspections. The records of a broker-dealer registered or required to be registered under this chapter and of an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter, including the records of a private fund described in paragraph (d) and the records of investment advisers to private funds, are subject to such reasonable periodic, special, or other audits or inspections by a representative of the administrator, within or without this state, as the administrator considers necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors. An audit or inspection may be made at any time and without prior notice. The administrator may copy, and remove for audit or inspection copies of, all records the administrator reasonably considers necessary or appropriate to conduct the audit or inspection. The administrator may assess a reasonable charge for conducting an audit or inspection under this subsection. (f) Custody and discretionary authority bond or insurance. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22), a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require a broker-dealer or investment adviser that has custody of or discretionary authority over funds or securities of a customer or client to obtain insurance or post a bond or other satisfactory form of security in an amount of at least $25,000, but not to exceed $100,000. The administrator may determine the requirements of the insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security. Insurance or a bond or other satisfactory form of security may not be required of a broker-dealer registered under this chapter whose net capital exceeds, or of an investment adviser registered under this chapter whose minimum financial requirements exceed, the amounts required by rule or order under this chapter. The insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security must permit an action by a person to enforce any liability on the insurance, bond, or other satisfactory form of security if instituted within the time limitations in section 80A.76(j)(2). (g) Requirements for custody. Subject to Section 15(h) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Section 78o(h)) or Section 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Section 80b-22), an agent may not have custody of funds or securities of a customer except under the supervision of a broker-dealer and an investment adviser representative may not have custody of funds or securities of a client except under the supervision of an investment adviser or a federal covered investment adviser. A rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may prohibit, limit, or impose conditions on a broker-dealer regarding custody of funds or securities of a customer and on an investment adviser regarding custody of securities or funds of a client. (h) Investment adviser brochure rule. With respect to an investment adviser registered or required to be registered under this chapter, a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require that information or other record be furnished or disseminated to clients or prospective clients in this state as necessary or appropriate in the public interest and for the protection of investors and advisory clients. (i) Continuing education. A rule adopted or order issued under this chapter may require an individual registered under section 80A.57 or 80A.58 to participate in a continuing education program approved by the Securities and Exchange Commission and administered by a self-regulatory organization, the North American Securities Administrators Association, or the commissioner. new text begin (j) Business continuity and succession plan. An investment adviser must establish, maintain, and enforce written policies and procedures relating to business continuity and succession planning. At a minimum, the policies and procedures under this paragraph must provide: new text end new text begin (1) a means to protect, back up, and recover books and records; new text end new text begin (2) an alternate method to provide notice to customers; key personnel; employees; vendors; service providers, including third-party custodians; and regulators, regarding issues pertaining to the investment adviser's business operations, including but not limited to significant business interruption, the death or unavailability of key personnel, other disruption to business activities, or ceasing business operations; new text end new text begin (3) a plan to relocate the office space for a principal place of business that is subject to a temporary or permanent loss; new text end new text begin (4) a plan to assign duties to qualified responsible persons if key personnel die or are otherwise unavailable; and new text end new text begin (5) a plan to otherwise minimize service disruption and client harm that might result from sudden and significant business interruption. new text end new text begin (k) Physical security and cybersecurity policies and procedures. An investment adviser must establish, implement, update, and enforce written physical security and cybersecurity policies and procedures that are designed to ensure the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of physical and electronic records and information. The policies and procedures must be tailored to the investment adviser's business model and must take into account the investment advisor's business size, type of service provided, and number of locations. new text end new text begin (1) The physical security and cybersecurity policies and procedures must: new text end new text begin (A) protect against reasonably anticipated threats or hazards to the security or integrity of client records and information; new text end new text begin (B) ensure that the investment adviser protects confidential client records and information; and new text end new text begin (C) protect client records and information that, if released, might result in harm or inconvenience to the client. new text end new text begin (2) At a minimum, the physical security and cybersecurity policies and procedures must develop and implement: new text end new text begin (A) an organizational understanding to manage information security risk with respect to systems, assets, data, and capabilities; new text end new text begin (B) safeguards to ensure delivery of critical infrastructure services; new text end new text begin (C) actions and tools to identify when an information security event occurs; new text end new text begin (D) actions to take when a information security event is detected; and new text end new text begin (E) plans for security and system resilience, and to restore capabilities or services that are impaired due to an information security event. new text end new text begin (3) At the time a client engages an investment adviser and on an annual basis thereafter, an investment adviser must deliver to the client a privacy policy that is reasonably designed to assist the client understand how the investment adviser collects and shares, to the extent permitted by state and federal law, nonpublic personal information. If information in the policy becomes inaccurate, the investment adviser must promptly update and deliver an amended privacy policy to the client. new text end new text begin (l) Written confirmation. A broker-dealer must promptly provide to the customer a written confirmation after executing a transaction and before completing a transaction. The confirmation must: new text end new text begin (1) describe the security purchased or sold, the date of the transaction, the price of the security purchased or sold, and any commission charged; new text end new text begin (2) indicate whether the broker-dealer acted for the broker-dealer's account, as an agent for a customer, as an agent for another person, or an agent for both a customer and another person; new text end new text begin (3) if the broker-dealer is acting as an agent for a customer, include (i) the name of the person who purchased the security, (ii) the name of the person who sold the security, or (iii) a statement that the information in item (i) or (ii) is available to a customer on request if the broker-dealer knows the information or is able to ascertain the information with reasonable diligence; new text end new text begin (4) indicate whether the transaction was unsolicited; and new text end new text begin (5) indicate the name of the agent that executed the transaction. new text end new text begin A broker-dealer that complies with Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 10b-10, Code of Federal Regulations, title 17, part 240.10b-10, or article III, section 12, of the Financial Institutions Regulatory Authority Rules of Fair Practice, complies with this paragraph. new text end new text begin (m) Conditions; stipulations; provisions. A broker-dealer is prohibited from entering into a contract with a customer if the contract contains a condition, stipulation, or provision that binds the customer to waive rights under chapter 80A; Minnesota Rules, chapter 2876; or an order issued by the commissioner. A condition, stipulation, or provision included in a contract subject to this paragraph is void. new text end new text begin (n) Principal office; employment. A broker-dealer whose principal office is located in Minnesota must have at least one registered person employed on a full-time basis at the principal office located in Minnesota. This paragraph does not apply to a broker-dealer engaged solely in offering and selling: new text end new text begin (1) interests in a direct participation program; or new text end new text begin (2) securities issued by open-end investment companies, face amount certificate companies, or unit investment trusts registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, United State Code, title 15, sections 80a-1 to 80a-64. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 80A.69, is amended to read: 80A.69 SECTION 502; PROHIBITED CONDUCT IN PROVIDING INVESTMENT ADVICE. (a) Fraud in providing investment advice. It is unlawful for a person that advises others for compensation, either directly or indirectly or through publications or writings, as to the value of securities or the advisability of investing in, purchasing, or selling securities or that, for compensation and as part of a regular business, issues or promulgates analyses or reports relating to securities: (1) to employ a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud another person; or (2) to engage in an act, practice, or course of business that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon another person. (b) Rules defining fraud. A rule adopted under this chapter may define an act, practice, or course of business of an investment adviser or an investment adviser representative, other than a supervised person of a federal covered investment adviser, as fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative, and prescribe means reasonably designed to prevent investment advisers and investment adviser representatives, other than supervised persons of a federal covered investment adviser, from engaging in acts, practices, and courses of business defined as fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative. (c) Rules specifying contents of advisory contract. A rule adopted under this chapter may specify the contents of an investment advisory contract entered into, extended, or renewed by an investment adviser. new text begin (d) Use of client login information. An investment adviser is prohibited from accessing a client's account by using the client's unique identifying information, including but not limited to the client's username and password. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [80A.691] BROKER-DEALERS; AGENTS; DISHONEST OR UNETHICAL BUSINESS PRACTICES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Broker-dealers; standards and principles. new text end new text begin A broker-dealer must observe high standards of commercial honor and just and equitable principles of trade when conducting the broker-dealer's business. An act or practice that is contrary to the standards constitutes grounds for the administrator to deny, suspend, or revoke the broker-dealer's registration or to take other action authorized by statute. For purposes of this subdivision, an act or practice that is contrary to the standards includes: new text end new text begin (1) engaging in a pattern of unreasonable and unjustifiable delays with respect to: (i) delivering securities purchased by a customer; or (ii) upon request, paying free credit balances reflecting a customer's completed transactions; new text end new text begin (2) inducing trading in a customer's account that is excessive in size or frequency considering the account's financial resources and character; new text end new text begin (3) recommending that a customer purchase, sell, or exchange a security without reasonable grounds to believe the transaction or recommendation is suitable for the customer, based on: (i) a reasonable inquiry regarding the customer's investment objectives, financial situation, and needs; and (ii) other relevant information known by the broker-dealer; new text end new text begin (4) executing a transaction on behalf of a customer without the customer's authorization; new text end new text begin (5) exercising discretionary power to effect a transaction for a customer's account without first obtaining written discretionary authority from the customer, unless the discretionary power relates solely to the time the order is executed or the order's price; new text end new text begin (6) executing a transaction in a margin account without securing from the customer a properly executed written margin agreement promptly after the account's initial transaction; new text end new text begin (7) failing to segregate customers' free securities or securities held in safekeeping; new text end new text begin (8) hypothecating a customer's securities without having a lien on the customer's securities, unless the broker-dealer secures the customer's properly executed written consent promptly after the initial transaction, except as permitted by Securities and Exchange Commission regulations; new text end new text begin (9) entering into a transaction with or for a customer at a price that is not reasonably related to the security's current market price, or receiving an unreasonable commission or profit; new text end new text begin (10) failing to furnish to a customer purchasing securities in an offering, no later than the due date for the transaction's confirmation: (i) a final prospectus; or (ii) a preliminary prospectus and an additional document that, when combined with the preliminary prospectus, includes all of the information included in the final prospectus; new text end new text begin (11) charging an unreasonable or inequitable fee for services performed, including: (i) miscellaneous services that include but are not limited to collecting money due for principal, dividends or interest, exchanging or transferring securities, appraisals, safekeeping, or maintaining custody of securities; and (ii) other services related to the broker-dealer's securities business; new text end new text begin (12) offering to buy or sell a security at a stated price if the broker-dealer is not prepared to purchase or sell at the stated price and under the stated conditions at the time the offer to buy or sell is made; new text end new text begin (13) representing that a security is being offered to a customer "at the market" or at a price relevant to the market price, unless the broker-dealer knows or has reasonable grounds to believe a market for the security exists other than the market made, created, or controlled by: (i) the broker-dealer; (ii) a person for whom the broker-dealer is acting or with whom the broker-dealer is associated with respect to the security's distribution; or (iii) a person controlled by, controlling, or under common control with the broker-dealer; new text end new text begin (14) effecting a transaction in, or inducing the purchase or sale of, a security using a manipulative, deceptive, or fraudulent device, practice, plan, program, design, or contrivance, which includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) effecting a transaction in a security that involves no change in the security's beneficial ownership; new text end new text begin (ii) entering an order to purchase or sell a security with the knowledge that at least one other order for the same security that is substantially the same size, entered at substantially the same time, and for substantially the same price as the order has been or will be entered by or for the same or a different party to create (A) a false or misleading appearance of active trading in the security, or (B) a false or misleading appearance with respect to the market for the security. This item does not prohibit a broker-dealer from entering bona fide agency cross transactions for the broker-dealer's customers; or new text end new text begin (iii) effecting, alone or with another person, a series of transactions in a security that creates actual or apparent active trading in the security, or raises or reduces the price of the security, to induce others to purchase or sell the security; new text end new text begin (15) guaranteeing a customer against loss in: (i) a securities account the broker-dealer carries for the customer; (ii) a securities transaction effected by the broker-dealer; or (iii) a securities transaction effected by the broker-dealer with or for the customer; new text end new text begin (16) publishing or circulating, or causing to be published or circulated, a notice, circular, advertisement, newspaper article, investment service, or communication of any kind that purports to: (i) report a transaction as a purchase or sale of a security, unless the broker-dealer believes that the transaction was a bona fide purchase or sale of the security; or (ii) quote the bid price or asked price for a security, unless the broker-dealer believes the quote represents a bona fide bid for or offer of the security; new text end new text begin (17) using an advertising or sales presentation in a manner that is deceptive or misleading, including but not limited to distributing: (i) nonfactual data, material, or a presentation based on conjecture, unfounded or unrealistic claims; or (ii) assertions in a brochure, flyer, or display using words, pictures, graphs, or other representations that are designed to supplement, detract from, supersede, or defeat a prospectus' or disclosure's purpose or effect; new text end new text begin (18) failing to disclose to a customer, before entering into a contract with or for a customer to purchase or sell a security, that the broker-dealer is controlled by, controlling, affiliated with, or under common control with the security's issuer. If a disclosure under this clause is not made in writing, the disclosure must be supplemented by giving or sending written disclosure before or at the time the transaction is completed; new text end new text begin (19) failing to make a bona fide public offering of all of the securities allotted to a broker-dealer for distribution, whether the securities are acquired as an underwriter, a selling group member, or from a member participating in the distribution as an underwriter or selling group member; new text end new text begin (20) failing or refusing to: (i) furnish a customer, upon reasonable request, information the customer is entitled to; or (ii) respond to a formal written request or complaint; new text end new text begin (21) failing to pay and fully satisfy a final judgment or arbitration award resulting from an arbitration or court proceeding relating to an investment and initiated by the customer, unless: (i) the customer and broker-dealer, or broker-dealer's agent, agree in writing to an alternative payment arrangement; and (ii) the broker-dealer or broker-dealer's agent complies with the terms of the alternative payment arrangement; new text end new text begin (22) attempting to avoid paying a final judgment or arbitration award resulting from an arbitration or court proceeding relating to an investment and initiated by the customer, unless: (i) the customer and broker-dealer, or broker-dealer's agent, agree in writing to an alternative payment arrangement; and (ii) the broker-dealer or broker-dealer's agent complies with the terms of the alternative payment arrangement; new text end new text begin (23) failing to pay and fully satisfy a fine, civil penalty, order of restitution, order of disgorgement, or similar monetary payment obligation imposed upon the broker-dealer or broker-dealer's agent by the Securities and Exchange Commission, a state or provincial securities or other financial services regulator, or a self-regulatory organization; new text end new text begin (24) accessing a client's account by using the client's unique identifying information, including but not limited to the client's username and password; new text end new text begin (25) in connection with soliciting a sale or purchase of an over-the-counter non-NASDAQ security, failing to promptly provide the most current prospectus or the most recently filed periodic report filed under Section 13 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, United States Code, title 15, section 78m, as amended, if the broker-dealer receives a request from a customer; new text end new text begin (26) marking an order ticket or confirmation as unsolicited if the transaction is solicited; new text end new text begin (27) for each month in which activity has occurred in a customer's account and no less frequently than once every three months regardless of whether customer account activity has occurred, failing to provide the customer with an account statement that, with respect to all over-the-counter non-NASDAQ equity securities in the account, contains a value for each security based on the closing market bid on a date certain. This clause applies only if the broker-dealer has been a market maker in the security at any time during the month in which the monthly or quarterly statement is issued; or new text end new text begin (28) failing to comply with an applicable provision of the Financial Institutions Regulatory Authority conduct rules or an applicable fair practice or ethical standard promulgated by the Securities Exchange Commission or a self-regulatory organization approved by the Securities Exchange Commission. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Broker-dealer's agents; standards and principles. new text end new text begin A broker-dealer's agent must observe high standards of commercial honor and just and equitable principles of trade when conducting the broker-dealer's agent's business. An act or practice that is contrary to the standards constitutes grounds for the administrator to deny, suspend, or revoke the broker-dealer's agent's registration or to take other action authorized by statute. For purposes of this subdivision, an act or practice that is contrary to the standards includes: new text end new text begin (1) lending to or borrowing from a customer money or securities, or acting as a custodian for a customer's money, securities, or executed stock power; new text end new text begin (2) effecting securities transactions that are not recorded on the regular books or records maintained by the broker-dealer the broker-dealer's agent represents, unless the transactions are authorized in writing by the broker-dealer before executing the transaction; new text end new text begin (3) establishing or maintaining an account that contains fictitious information in order to execute transactions that are otherwise prohibited; new text end new text begin (4) sharing directly or indirectly in profits or losses in a customer account without the written authorization from the customer and the broker-dealer the broker-dealer's agent represents; new text end new text begin (5) dividing or otherwise splitting the broker-dealer's agent's commissions, profits, or other compensation from purchasing or selling securities with a person who is not also registered as a broker-dealer's agent for the same broker-dealer or for a broker-dealer under direct or indirect common control; or new text end new text begin (6) engaging in the conduct specified under subdivision 1, clauses (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (9), (10), (14), (15), (16), (17), (21), (22), (23), (24), (25), (26), (27), or (28). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Conduct specified not exclusive. new text end new text begin The conduct identified as a violation under subdivisions 1 and 2 is not exclusive. A broker-dealer or broker-dealer's agent that engages in other conduct, including but not limited to forgery, embezzlement, nondisclosure, incomplete disclosure or misstatement of material facts, or manipulative or deceptive practices, is also subject to denial, suspension, or revocation of registration. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 80C.12, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Grounds. The commissioner, with or without prior notice or hearing, may issue a cease and desist order and may issue an order denying, suspending or revoking any registration, amendment or exemption on finding any of the following: deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end that the applicant, registrant or franchisor or any officer, director, agent or employee thereof or any other person has violated or failed to comply with any provision of sections 80C.01 to 80C.22 or any rule or order of the commissioner; deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end that the offer, sale, or purchase of the franchise would constitute misrepresentation to or deceit or fraud upon purchasers thereof, or has worked or tended to work a fraud upon purchasers or would so operate; deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end that the applicant, registrant or franchisor or any officer, director, agent or employee thereof or any other person is engaging or about to engage in false, fraudulent or deceptive practices in connection with the offer and sale of a franchise; deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end that any person identified in a public offering statement has beennew text begin :new text end new text begin (i)new text end convicted of an offensenew text begin or held liable in a civil action by final judgmentnew text end described in section 80C.04,new text begin subdivision 1, paragraph (e),new text end clause deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end new text begin , has a civil or criminal action pending as described in section 80C.04, subdivision 1, paragraph (e), clause (5)new text end , or is subject to an orderdeleted text begin , or has had a civil judgment entered against the person as described in section 80C.04, clause (5),deleted text end new text begin described in section 80C.04, subdivision 1, paragraph (e), clauses (2) to (4);new text end andnew text begin (ii)new text end the involvement of the person in the business of the applicant or franchisor creates a substantial risk to prospective franchisees; deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end that the financial condition of the franchisor adversely affects or would adversely affect the ability of the franchisor to fulfill its obligations under the franchise agreement; deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end that the franchisor's enterprise or method of business includes or would include activities which are illegal where performed;new text begin ornew text end deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end that the method of sale or proposed method of sale of franchises or the operation of the business of the franchisor or any term or condition of the franchise agreement or any practice of the franchisor is or would be unfair or inequitable to franchisees. Sec. 6. new text begin OTHER REAL ESTATE; EXPEDITED RULEMAKING.new text end new text begin The commissioner of commerce must adopt rules amending Minnesota Rules, part 2675.2170, item A, to conform with generally accepted accounting principles. The commissioner of commerce may use the expedited rulemaking process under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.389, to amend Minnesota Rules, part 2675.2170, item A, under this section. new text end